District of Columbia statutes.
45-402

Ordinances of Washington and of levy court.

All laws and ordinances of the City of Washington, and of the levy court of the District of Columbia, except as modified or repealed by Congress or the Legislative Assembly of the District since June 1, 1871, or until so modified or repealed, remain in full force.

R.S., D.C., § 91
Comp. Stat. D.C., 398, § 4
Feb. 11, 1895, 28 Stat. 650, ch. 79
1981 Ed., § 49-302.
1973 Ed., § 49-302.